src/fst/morphology/compounding.lexc
LEXICON R
 +Cmp#:# NounRoot ;          ! sanakirja, maa-aalto
 +Cmp#:- NounRoot ;          ! sana-kirja, maa-aalto
 +Cmp/Hyph#:#- ProperNoun ;  ! sananiekka-Bengt


LEXICON RHyph
 +Cmp/Hyph#:#- NounRoot ;
 +Cmp/Hyph#:#- ProperNoun ;

LEXICON RNum
      +Use/Circ+Cmp/Hyph#:- NounRoot ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num 
